Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-227
Constitutional convention; submission of proposals; time; form; manner.

The convention shall fix and prescribe the time, form, and manner of submitting to the electors of the state any proposal to revise, amend, or change the Constitution of Nebraska.

Laws 1953, c. 173, § 16, p. 552.